Virginia statutes. Title 30. General Assembly.
Chapter 49. Virginia Commission on the Centennial of the Woodrow Wilson Presidency.

§§ 30-319 through 30-325.
Expired July 1, 2013.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2010, c. 667, cl. 3, as amended by Acts 2012, c. 571, cl. 1 provides: “That if the Commission is not funded by nonpublic funds by July 1, 2013, this chapter shall expire on July 1 of the fiscal year that the Commission fails to receive such funding.” Funding was not provided.

Former § 30-319, the Virginia Commission on the Centennial of the Woodrow Wilson Presidency; purpose, was enacted by Acts 2010, c. 667.

Former § 30-320, membership; terms; quorum; meetings, was enacted by Acts 2010, c. 667.

Former § 30-321, Virginia Commission on the Centennial of the Woodrow Wilson Presidency Fund established, was enacted by Acts 2010, c. 667.

Former § 30-322, compensation; expenses, was enacted by Acts 2010, c. 667.

Former § 30-323, powers and duties of the Commission, was enacted by Acts 2010, c. 667.

Former § 30-324, staffing, was enacted by Acts 2010, c. 667.

Former § 30-325, sunset, was enacted by Acts 2010, c. 667.